Utah statutes.
17-50-315.   Study and improvement of county government -- Charges and expenses.

(1) A county may, individually or in association with other counties, study the processes and methods of county government with a view to improvement and cause to be assembled and presented to the Legislature or the Congress of the United States, or to or before the appropriate committees of either or both, such information and factual data with respect to the effect upon counties, the taxpayers, and the people, of existing, pending or proposed legislation, as in the judgment of county executives and legislative bodies, will be in the interest of and beneficial to counties, taxpayers, and people.

(2)  The charges and expenses incurred under Subsection (1) shall be proper claim against county funds, to be audited and paid as other county claims.

